apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="Česk/á_republika__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á<b/>republika</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>republiky</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>republice</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou<b/>republiku</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>á<b/>republiko</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>republice</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou<b/>republikou</l>
        <r>á<b/>republika<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Spojen/é_království__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ého<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ému<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>é<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ém<b/>království</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ým<b/>královstvím</l>
        <r>é<b/>království<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Pozna/ň__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ň</l>
        <r>ň<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ň</l>
        <r>ň<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ně</l>
        <r>ň<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l>
        <r>ň<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l>
        <r>ň<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ní</l>
        <r>ň<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l>
        <r>ň<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Budapeš/ť__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ť</l>
        <r>ť<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ti</l>
        <r>ť<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ti</l>
        <r>ť<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ť</l>
        <r>ť<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tí</l>
        <r>ť<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ti</l>
        <r>ť<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ti</l>
        <r>ť<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Kanad/a__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ě</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ě</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ám</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ách</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="Budapešť"><i>Budapeš</i><par n="Budapeš/ť__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Irská republika"><i>Irsk</i><par n="Česk/á_republika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kanada"><i>Kanad</i><par n="Kanad/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Poznaň"><i>Pozna</i><par n="Pozna/ň__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Spojené království"><i>Spojen</i><par n="Spojen/é_království__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Spojené království Velké Británie a Severního Irska"><i>Spojen</i><par n="Spojen/é_království__np"/><p><l><b/>Velké<b/>Británie<b/>a<b/>Severního<b/>Irska</l><r><g><b/>Velké<b/>Británie<b/>a<b/>Severního<b/>Irska</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="Toruň"><i>Toru</i><par n="Pozna/ň__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Česká republika"><i>Česk</i><par n="Česk/á_republika__np"/></e>
